Nevada, session 83, AB81.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 234 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The State of Nevada exempts itself from the provisions of
15 U.S.C. § 260a(a) requiring the advancement of time during the
period commencing at 2 a.m. on the second Sunday of March of
each year and ending at 2 a.m. on the first Sunday of November of
each year, commonly known as daylight saving time.
2. During the period described in subsection 1, the State of
Nevada and all political subdivisions thereof shall observe the
standard time otherwise applicable for the time zone in which the
State is situated in accordance with the provisions of 15 U.S.C. §§
260 et seq., the solar time of the 120th meridian west of
Greenwich, commonly known as Pacific Standard Time.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on January 1, 2026.
H
-
*AB81_R1*